Hawaii statutes.
[§520-1] Purpose. The purpose of this
chapter is to encourage owners of land to make land and water areas available
to the public for recreational purposes by limiting their liability toward
persons entering thereon for such purposes. [L 1969, c 186, §1]

Case Notes

Cited: 557 F.2d 1308; 916 F. Supp. 1511.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next